Louisiana, session 2026, SB148.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:103(C)(1)(l) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§103. Planning commission; membership; appointment
C.(1) * * *
* * *
(l) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the governing
authorities of the municipalities of Addis, Arcadia, Brusly, Delhi, Gramercy,
Haughton, Haynesville, Iowa, Jena, Lake Arthur, Lake Charles, Lockport, and
Many may pay a per diem to members of their respective municipal planning
commissions for attending meetings of any such commission. The rate of per diem
to be paid to such members and the number of meetings for which per diem shall be
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 148 ENROLLED
paid shall be established by ordinance of the governing authority of each
municipality.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.